District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “LIHTC Rent Stabilization Exemption Clarification Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 205(a)(1) of the District of Columbia Rental Housing Act of 1985,
effective July 17, 1985, (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.05(a)(1)), is amended by
striking the phrase “as defined in section 206(f)(2)(A);” and inserting the phrase “as defined in
section 206(f)(2)(A), or any rental unit for which the housing provider receives tax credits
pursuant to the Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program as defined in section 2(5) of the Low-
Income Housing Tax Credit Fund Act of 2004, effective April 8, 2005, (D.C. Law 15-299; D.C.
Official Code § 42-2853.01(5));” in its place.
Sec 3. Applicability
This act shall apply as of July 17, 1985.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2